Wisconsin, session 2025, SB865.
do enact as follows:SB865,11Section 1. 71.05 (6) (a) 15. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 215, is amended to read:SB865,2,8371.05 (6) (a) 15. The amount of the credits computed under s. 71.07 (2dm), 4(2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), (5f), (5h), 5(5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8t), and (10) and not passed through by a 6partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 7that amount to the partnership’s, company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income 8under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB865,29Section 2. 71.07 (8t) of the statutes is created to read:SB865,2,111071.07 (8t) Amusement device sales tax credit. (a) Definitions. In this 11subsection:SB865,2,13121. “Amusement device” means any single or multiplayer device, machine, or 13game played for amusement.SB865,2,14142. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB865,2,15153. “Municipality” means a city, village, or town.SB865,3,216(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and 17subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 18credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the amount of those taxes, an 19amount equal to the sum of the county sales and use tax imposed under s. 77.70 (2) 20(a) and the sales and use tax imposed by a municipality under subch. V of ch. 77 1paid by the claimant in the taxable year on sales of a service described in s. 77.52 (2) 2(a) 2. a. purchased through an amusement device.SB865,3,103(c) Limitations. Partnerships, tax-option corporations, and limited liability 4companies may not claim a credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and 5the amount of, the credit are based on their taxes paid under par. (b). A 6partnership, tax-option corporation, or limited liability company shall compute the 7amount of the credit that each of its partners, shareholders, or members may claim 8and shall provide that information to each of them. Partners of a partnership, 9shareholders of tax-option corporations, and members of limited liability companies 10may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interest.SB865,3,1211(d) Administration. 1. Section 71.28 (4) (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the 12credit under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB865,3,18132. If a credit computed under this subsection is not entirely offset against 14Wisconsin income or franchise taxes otherwise due, the unused balance may be 15carried forward and credited against Wisconsin income or franchise taxes 16otherwise due for the following 20 taxable years to the extent not offset by these 17taxes otherwise due in all intervening years between the year in which the 18expenditure was made and the year in which the carry-forward credit is claimed.SB865,319Section 3. 71.10 (4) (cu) of the statutes is created to read:SB865,3,202071.10 (4) (cu) Amusement device sales tax credit under s. 71.07 (8t).SB865,421Section 4. 71.21 (4) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 22is amended to read:SB865,4,22371.21 (4) (a) The amount of the credits computed by a partnership under s. 2471.07 (2dm), (2dx), (2dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3s), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (4k), (4n), 1(5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8t), and (10) and passed through to 2partners shall be added to the partnership’s income.SB865,53Section 5. 71.26 (2) (a) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 415, is amended to read:SB865,4,10571.26 (2) (a) 4. Plus the amount of the credit computed under s. 71.28 (1dm), 6(1dx), (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), (3wm), (3y), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), 7(5r), (5rm), (6n), (8t), and (10) and not passed through by a partnership, limited 8liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added that amount to the 9partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option corporation’s income under 10s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g).SB865,611Section 6. 71.28 (8t) of the statutes is created to read:SB865,4,131271.28 (8t) Amusement device sales tax credit. (a) Definitions. In this 13subsection:SB865,4,15141. “Amusement device” means any single or multiplayer device, machine, or 15game played for amusement.SB865,4,16162. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB865,4,17173. “Municipality” means a city, village, or town.SB865,4,2418(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and 19subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 20credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.23, up to the amount of those taxes, an 21amount equal to the sum of the county sales and use tax imposed under s. 77.70 (2) 22(a) and the sales and use tax imposed by a municipality under subch. V of ch. 77 23paid by the claimant in the taxable year on sales of a service described in s. 77.52 (2) 24(a) 2. a. purchased through an amusement device.SB865,5,81(c) Limitations. Partnerships, tax-option corporations, and limited liability 2companies may not claim a credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and 3the amount of, the credit are based on their taxes paid under par. (b). A 4partnership, tax-option corporation, or limited liability company shall compute the 5amount of the credit that each of its partners, shareholders, or members may claim 6and shall provide that information to each of them. Partners of a partnership, 7shareholders of tax-option corporations, and members of limited liability companies 8may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interest.SB865,5,109(d) Administration. 1. Subsection (4) (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the credit 10under sub. (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB865,5,16112. If a credit computed under this subsection is not entirely offset against 12Wisconsin income or franchise taxes otherwise due, the unused balance may be 13carried forward and credited against Wisconsin income or franchise taxes 14otherwise due for the following 20 taxable years to the extent not offset by these 15taxes otherwise due in all intervening years between the year in which the 16expenditure was made and the year in which the carry-forward credit is claimed.SB865,717Section 7. 71.30 (3) (cu) of the statutes is created to read:SB865,5,181871.30 (3) (cu) Amusement device sales tax credit under s. 71.28 (8t).SB865,819Section 8. 71.34 (1k) (g) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2015, is amended to read:SB865,5,242171.34 (1k) (g) An addition shall be made for credits computed by a tax-option 22corporation under s. 71.28 (1dm), (1dx), (1dy), (3), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3t), (3w), 23(3wm), (3y), (4), (5), (5f), (5g), (5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8t), and (10) and 24passed through to shareholders.SB865,91Section 9. 71.45 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 215, is amended to read:SB865,6,9371.45 (2) (a) 10. By adding to federal taxable income the amount of credit 4computed under s. 71.47 (1dm) to (1dy), (3g), (3h), (3n), (3q), (3w), (3y), (5f), (5g), 5(5h), (5i), (5j), (5k), (5r), (5rm), (6n), (8t), and (10) and not passed through by a 6partnership, limited liability company, or tax-option corporation that has added 7that amount to the partnership’s, limited liability company’s, or tax-option 8corporation’s income under s. 71.21 (4) or 71.34 (1k) (g) and the amount of credit 9computed under s. 71.47 (3), (3t), (4), (4m), and (5).SB865,1010Section 10. 71.47 (8t) of the statutes is created to read:SB865,6,121171.47 (8t) Amusement device sales tax credit. (a) Definitions. In this 12subsection:SB865,6,14131. “Amusement device” means any single or multiplayer device, machine, or 14game played for amusement.SB865,6,15152. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB865,6,16163. “Municipality” means a city, village, or town.SB865,6,2317(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and 18subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 19credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.43, up to the amount of those taxes, an 20amount equal to the sum of the county sales and use tax imposed under s. 77.70 (2) 21(a) and the sales and use tax imposed by a municipality under subch. V of ch. 77 22paid by the claimant in the taxable year on sales of a service described in s. 77.52 (2) 23(a) 2. a. purchased through an amusement device.SB865,7,724(c) Limitations. Partnerships, tax-option corporations, and limited liability 1companies may not claim a credit under this subsection, but the eligibility for, and 2the amount of, the credit are based on their taxes paid under par. (b). A 3partnership, tax-option corporation, or limited liability company shall compute the 4amount of the credit that each of its partners, shareholders, or members may claim 5and shall provide that information to each of them. Partners of a partnership, 6shareholders of tax-option corporations, and members of limited liability companies 7may claim the credit in proportion to their ownership interest.SB865,7,98(d) Administration. 1. Section 71.28 (4) (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the 9credit under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credit under this subsection.SB865,7,15102. If a credit computed under this subsection is not entirely offset against 11Wisconsin income or franchise taxes otherwise due, the unused balance may be 12carried forward and credited against Wisconsin income or franchise taxes 13otherwise due for the following 20 taxable years to the extent not offset by these 14taxes otherwise due in all intervening years between the year in which the 15expenditure was made and the year in which the carry-forward credit is claimed.SB865,1116Section 11. 71.49 (1) (cu) of the statutes is created to read:SB865,7,171771.49 (1) (cu) Amusement device sales tax credit under s. 71.47 (8t).SB865,7,1818